Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 5

Abatement and Survival of Actions

20-5-101. No abatement where cause survives.

Actions do not abate by the death or other disability of either party, or by the transfer of any interest in the action, if the cause of action survives or continues.

Code 1858, § 2845 (deriv. Acts 1785, ch. 2, § 2; 1786, ch. 14, § 1; 1819, ch. 16, §§ 1, 3; 1835-1836, ch. 77, § 1); Shan., § 4568; mod. Code 1932, § 8693; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-601.

Cross-References. Costs on abatement, §§20-12-110,20-12-113.

Death of party during continuance, §20-7-105.

Motion for judgment against officer, §25-3-106.

Revival of judgments, title 25, ch. 4.

Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 319.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 691, 706.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 26; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 8.

Law Reviews.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

The Abatement of Criminal Fines upon Death of Defendant: Punishment, Precedent, and Policy, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 67.

Wrongful Death Actions in Tennessee (T. A. Smedley), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 447.

Comparative Legislation. Abatement and survival of actions:

Ala. Code §6-5-460 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-62-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §9-2-40 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 411.130, 411.140.

Miss. Code Ann. §11-7-25 et seq.

Mo. Sup. Ct. R. 52.13.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 1A-1, Rule 25.

Va. Code § 8.01-16 et seq.

Cited: Brummett v. Evans, 148 F. Supp. 309, 1957 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4020 (D. Tenn. 1957); Miller v. Bomar, 230 F. Supp. 204, 1963 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6572 (M.D. Tenn. 1963); Commercial Truck & Trailer Sales, Inc. v. McCampbell, 580 S.W.2d 765, 1979 Tenn. LEXIS 427 (Tenn. 1979); Leffew v. Mayes, 685 S.W.2d 288, 1984 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3055 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1984); Brock v. Warren County, 713 F. Supp. 238, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 5027 (E.D. Tenn. 1989); Thompson v. Williamson County, 219 F.3d 555, 2000 FED App. 233P, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 16679 (6th Cir. Tenn. 2000); Rusnak v. Phebus, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 328 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 29, 2008); Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009).

20-5-102. Actions surviving death of party.

No civil action commenced, whether founded on wrongs or contracts, except actions for wrongs affecting the character of the plaintiff, shall abate by the death of either party, but may be revived; nor shall any right of action arising hereafter based on the wrongful act or omission of another, except actions for wrongs affecting the character, be abated by the death of the party wronged; but the right of action shall pass in like manner as the right of action described in §20-5-106.

Code 1858, § 2846 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 77, § 1); Shan., § 4569; Code 1932, § 8694; Acts 1967, ch. 121, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-602.

Cross-References. Abolition of common-law tort action of alienation of affections, §36-3-701.

Revivor of actions pending against a person at the time of death, §30-2-320, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Survival of action for injury to real property, §29-36-104.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 319.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 688, 691, 706, 707.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, §§ 26-28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Libel and Slander, § 32; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Issues Raised by “Jordan” (John A. Day), 35 No.12 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1999).

Stealing Love in Tennessee: The Thief Goes Free, 56 Tenn. L. Rev. 629 (1989).

Torts — Jordan v. Baptist Three Rivers Hospital: The Tennessee Supreme Court Allows Recovery of Parental Consortium in Wrongful Death Actions, 30 U. Mem. L. Rev. 439 (2000).

Cited: Commercial Truck & Trailer Sales, Inc. v. McCampbell, 580 S.W.2d 765, 1979 Tenn. LEXIS 427 (Tenn. 1979); Leffew v. Mayes, 685 S.W.2d 288, 1984 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3055 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1984); Brooks v. Memphis & Shelby County Hospital Authority, 717 S.W.2d 292, 1986 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3067 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1986); Can Do Pension & Profit Sharing Plan & Successor Plans v. Manier, Herod, Hollabaugh & Smith, 922 S.W.2d 865, 1996 Tenn. LEXIS 304 (Tenn. 1996); Claybrook v. Birchwell, 199 F.3d 350,2000 FED App. 14P, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 297 (6th Cir. Tenn. 2000); McCormick v. Ill. Cent. R.R. Co., — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 357 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 19, 2009); Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009).

20-5-103. Causes surviving death of tort-feasor.

In all cases where a person commits a tortious or wrongful act causing injury or death to another, or property damage, and the person committing the wrongful act dies before suit is instituted to recover damages, the death of that person shall not abate any cause of action that the plaintiff would have otherwise had, but the cause of action shall survive and may be prosecuted against the personal representative of the tort-feasor or wrongdoer.

The common law rule abating such actions upon the death of the wrongdoer and before suit is commenced is abrogated.

This section shall not apply to actions for wrongs affecting the character of the plaintiff.

Acts 1935, ch. 104, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8243.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-603.

Cross-References. Abolition of common-law tort action of alienation of affections, §36-3-701.

Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 691, 714, 740.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, §§ 26, 28.

Law Reviews.

Abatement and Revival — Actions Affecting the Character of the Plaintiff, 20 Tenn. L. Rev. 373.

Torts — Taylor v. Beard: The Tennessee Supreme Court Declines Adoption of a Cause of Action for Loss of Parental Consortium in Personal Injury Cases, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 737 (2004).

Cited: In re Estate of Thompson, 203 Tenn. 485, 314 S.W.2d 6, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 326 (1958); Carpenter v. Johnson, 514 S.W.2d 868, 1974 Tenn. LEXIS 460 (Tenn. 1974); Owens v. State, 710 S.W.2d 518, 1986 Tenn. LEXIS 831 (Tenn. 1986); Estate of Russell v. Snow, 829 S.W.2d 136, 1992 Tenn. LEXIS 234 (Tenn. 1992); Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009).

20-5-104. Revival by or against heirs.

If no person will administer on the estate of a deceased plaintiff or defendant, the suit may be revived by or against the heirs of the decedent.

Code 1858, § 2849 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 121, § 3); Shan., § 4571; Code 1932, § 8696; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-605.

Cross-References. Descent and distribution, §§31-1-101,31-2-101.

Revival of judgment against heirs, §25-4-104.

Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 70.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 709, 714, 857.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, §§ 26-33.

Cited: Owens v. State, 710 S.W.2d 518, 1986 Tenn. LEXIS 831 (Tenn. 1986); Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009).

20-5-105. Revival by or against successor in interest.

If the decedent has parted with the decedent's interest pending the suit, it may be revived by or against the successor in interest instead of the representative or heir.

Code 1858, § 2850 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 64); Shan., § 4572; Code 1932, § 8697; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-606.

Cross-References. Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 319.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 709.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 7; 6 Tenn. Juris., Compromise and Settlement, § 5.

Law Reviews.

Issues Raised by “Jordan” (John A. Day), 35 No.12 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1999).

Cited: Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009).

20-5-106. Injury resulting in death — Succession to cause of action — Beneficiary who is minor or legally incompetent.

The right of action that a person who dies from injuries received from another, or whose death is caused by the wrongful act, omission, or killing by another, would have had against the wrongdoer, in case death had not ensued, shall not abate or be extinguished by the person's death but shall pass to the person's surviving spouse and, in case there is no surviving spouse, to the person's children or next of kin; to the person's personal representative, for the benefit of the person's surviving spouse or next of kin; to the person's natural parents or parent or next of kin if at the time of death decedent was in the custody of the natural parents or parent and had not been legally surrendered or abandoned by them pursuant to any court order removing such person from the custody of such parents or parent; or otherwise to the person's legally adoptive parents or parent, or to the administrator for the use and benefit of the adoptive parents or parent; the funds recovered in either case to be free from the claims of creditors.

In any case involving a beneficiary who is a minor or who is legally incompetent, if the court finds it is in the best interest of the beneficiary, the court in its discretion may authorize all or any portion of the funds recovered for the beneficiary to be added to any trust or trusts established for the benefit of the beneficiary, wherever situated, whether the trust was created by the person whose death was caused by the wrongful action or omission or by any other person. The funds recovered shall be for the benefit of the beneficiary and shall be free from the claims of creditors.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the right to institute and the right to collect any proceeds from a wrongful death action granted by this section to a surviving spouse shall be waived, if the children or next of kin establish the surviving spouse has abandoned the deceased spouse as described in § 36-4-101(a)(13) or otherwise willfully withdrawn for a period of two (2) years.

If the period of two (2) years has passed since the time of abandonment or willful withdrawal, then there is created a rebuttable presumption that the surviving spouse abandoned the deceased spouse for purposes of this section.

In an action under this section, the child or next of kin shall serve the surviving spouse with process as provided in the rules of civil procedure or by constructive service as may otherwise be provided by law.

As used in this section, “person” includes a fetus that was viable at the time of injury. A fetus shall be considered viable if it had achieved a stage of development wherein it could reasonably be expected to be capable of living outside the uterus.

Code 1858, § 2291 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 58, § 1; 1851-1852, ch. 17); Acts 1871, ch. 78, § 1; Shan., § 4025; Code 1932, § 8236; Acts 1945, ch. 58, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8236; Acts 1953, ch. 210, § 1; 1959, ch. 240, § 1; 1975, ch. 284, § 1; 1978, ch. 742, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-607; Acts 1991, ch. 196, § 1; 1998, ch. 866, § 1; 2011, ch. 366, § 1.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (c) and redesignated former (c) as present (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 366, § 4. May 30, 2011.

Cross-References. Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 611, 637.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-8-6.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 9; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 50, 225; 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 36; 6 Tenn. Juris., Compromise and Settlement, § 5; 6 Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 93; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 10.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 803(1.2).7.

Law Reviews.

Issues Raised by “Jordan” (John A. Day), 35 No.12 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1999).

Loss of filial consortium (John A. Day), 37 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2001).

Some Order Out of Chaos in Wrongful Death Law (T. A. Smedley), 37 Vand. L. Rev. 273 (1984).

The Tennessee Hospital Lien Law — A Potential Pitfall for the Unwary (E. Patrick Hull), 35 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1999).

Attorney General Opinions. Liability for infants born with narcotic drug dependency. OAG 13-01 (revised), 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/1/13).

Cited: Byrne v. Kansas City, Ft. S. & M. R. Co., 55 F. 44, 1893 U.S. App. LEXIS 2527 (C.C.D. Tenn. 1893); Burnett v. Layman, 133 Tenn. 323, 181 S.W. 157, 1915 Tenn. LEXIS 95 (1915); Brown v. Ellison, 12 Tenn. App. 27, — S.W. —, 1926 Tenn. App. LEXIS 209 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1926); Landrum v. Callaway, 12 Tenn. App. 150, — S.W.2d —, 1930 Tenn. App. LEXIS 48 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1930); Rye v. Dupont Rayon Co., 163 Tenn. 95, 40 S.W.2d 1041, 1931 Tenn. LEXIS 92 (1931); West v. Cincinnati, N. O. & T. P. R. Co., 108 F. Supp. 276, 1952 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2250 (D. Tenn. 1952); Troxel v. Jones, 45 Tenn. App. 264, 322 S.W.2d 251, 1958 Tenn. App. LEXIS 125 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1958); Morristown v. Inman, 47 Tenn. App. 685, 342 S.W.2d 71, 1960 Tenn. App. LEXIS 102 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1960); Kington v. United States, 265 F. Supp. 699, 1967 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 8982 (E.D. Tenn. 1967); Rives v. International Oil Burner Co., 298 F. Supp. 1146, 1969 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9034 (E.D. Tenn. 1969); Chess v. Nunley, 319 F. Supp. 1288, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9162 (E.D. Tenn. 1970); McDaniel v. Baptist Memorial Hospital, 352 F. Supp. 690, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10757 (W.D. Tenn. 1971); Woods v. Palmer, 496 S.W.2d 474, 1973 Tenn. LEXIS 476 (Tenn. 1973); Cummings v. Cowan, 390 F. Supp. 1251, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13512 (N.D. Miss. 1975); O'Neal v. Southern R. Co., 403 F. Supp. 1115, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12356 (E.D. Tenn. 1975); Cline v. Richards, 455 F. Supp. 42, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14404 (E.D. Tenn. 1977); Caldwell v. Metcalfe, 458 F. Supp. 847, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12616 (E.D. Tenn. 1977); Brooks v. Memphis & Shelby County Hospital Authority, 717 S.W.2d 292, 1986 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3067 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1986); Hathaway v. Middle Tennessee Anesthesiology, P.C., 724 S.W.2d 355, 1986 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3408 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1986); Vaughn v. J.C. Penney Co., 822 F.2d 605, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 7965 (6th Cir. Ohio 1987); Kirksey v. Overton Pub, Inc., 739 S.W.2d 230, 1987 Tenn. App. LEXIS 2792 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1987); Sharpe v. Lewisburg, 677 F. Supp. 1362, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 905 (M.D. Tenn. 1988); Davis v. Davis, 842 S.W.2d 588, 1992 Tenn. LEXIS 400 (Tenn. 1992); Spence v. Miles Lab., 37 F.3d 1185, 1994 FED App. 352P, 1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 29071 (6th Cir. 1994); Miller v. Niblack, 942 S.W.2d 533, 1996 Tenn. App. LEXIS 645 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1996); Alexander v. Beale St. Blues Co., 108 F. Supp. 2d 934, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 22251 (W.D. Tenn. 1999); Claybrook v. Birchwell, 199 F.3d 350,2000 FED App. 14P, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 297 (6th Cir. Tenn. 2000); Planned Parenthood of Middle Tenn. v. Sundquist, 38 S.W.3d 1, 2000 Tenn. LEXIS 515 (Tenn. 2000); Foster v. St. Joseph Hosp., 158 S.W.3d 418, 2004 Tenn. App. LEXIS 491 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2004); Miller v. Dacus, 231 S.W.3d 903, 2007 Tenn. LEXIS 648 (Tenn. Aug. 17, 2007); Flax v. DaimlerChrysler Corp., 272 S.W.3d 521, 2008 Tenn. LEXIS 505 (Tenn. July 24, 2008); Gordon v. Draughn, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 367 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 16, 2009); In re Benjamin M., 310 S.W.3d 844, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 737 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 30, 2009); Taylor v. Lakeside Behavioral Health Sys., — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 198 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 15, 2010); Atkinson v. State, 337 S.W.3d 199, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 440 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 9, 2010); Givens v. Josovitz, 343 S.W.3d 76, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 705 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 9, 2010); Zakour v. Ut Med. Group, Inc., — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 261 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 19, 2011).

20-5-107. Prosecution of action by representative or surviving spouse or next of kin.

The action may be instituted by the personal representative of the deceased or by the surviving spouse in the surviving spouse's own name, or, if there is no surviving spouse, by the children of the deceased or by the next of kin; also, without the consent of the personal representative, either may use the personal representative's name in bringing and prosecuting the suit, on giving bond and security for costs, or in the form prescribed for paupers. The personal representative shall not, in such case, be responsible for costs, unless the personal representative signs the prosecution bond in an individual capacity.

In no event shall a parent be permitted to recover through an action commenced pursuant to subsection (a) until all child support arrearages, together with interest on the child support arrearages, at the legal rate of interest computed from the date each payment was due, have been paid in full to the parent ordered to receive the support or to the parent's estate if deceased.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a parent who has intentionally refused or neglected to pay any support for a child for a two-year period, or for the life of the child, whichever is less, when subject to a court order requiring the payment of child support and who has intentionally refused or neglected to contact the child or exercise visitation during such period, shall not be permitted to recover through an action commenced pursuant to subsection (a) and § 20-5-106.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the institution of an action by a child with respect to the death of a parent.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the right to institute and the right to collect any proceeds from a wrongful death action granted by this section to a surviving spouse shall be waived, if the children or next of kin establish the surviving spouse has abandoned the deceased spouse as described in § 36-4-101(a)(13) or otherwise willfully withdrawn for a period of two (2) years.

If the period of two (2) years has passed since the time of abandonment or willful withdrawal then there is created a rebuttable presumption that the surviving spouse abandoned the deceased spouse for purposes of this section.

In an action under this section, the child or next of kin shall serve the surviving spouse with process as provided in the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure or by constructive service as may otherwise be provided by law.

In no event shall any action for wrongful death abate, or the statute of limitations bar, an action solely as a result of a finding the surviving spouse's rights are waived. Instead the court shall substitute the proper party.

Code 1858, § 2292 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 58, §§ 1, 2; 1851-1852, ch. 17); Acts 1871, ch. 78, § 2; Shan., § 4026; mod. Code 1932, § 8237; Acts 1975, ch. 284, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-608; Acts 1994, ch. 939, § 1; 2003, ch. 25, § 1; 2011, ch. 366, § 2.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 366, § 4. May 30, 2011.

Cross-References. Substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. Rule 25.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 637.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 50; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Professional Responsibility — Kline v. Eyrich: Use of the Common Fund Doctrine in Wrongful Death Actions in Tennessee: Preventing Unjust Enrichment or Simply Unjust?, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 233 (2003).

Torts — Hataway v. McKinley: Moving From Spacial Relationships to Significant Relationships, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 257 (1992).

Cited: Stewart v. Crook Sanatorium, 17 Tenn. App. 589, 69 S.W.2d 259, 1933 Tenn. App. LEXIS 93 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1933); Caldwell v. Metcalfe, 458 F. Supp. 847, 1977 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12616 (E.D. Tenn. 1977); Johnson v. Metropolitan Government of Nashville & Davidson County, 665 S.W.2d 717, 1984 Tenn. LEXIS 745 (Tenn. 1984); Mangrum v. Owens, 917 S.W.2d 244, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 649 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995); Alexander v. Beale St. Blues Co., 108 F. Supp. 2d 934, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 22251 (W.D. Tenn. 1999); Foster v. St. Joseph Hosp., 158 S.W.3d 418, 2004 Tenn. App. LEXIS 491 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2004); Holliman v. McGrew, 343 S.W.3d 68, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 58 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 5, 2009); Taylor v. Lakeside Behavioral Health Sys., — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 198 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 15, 2010); Givens v. Josovitz, 343 S.W.3d 76, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 705 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 9, 2010).

20-5-108. Continuation of decedent's action.

If the deceased had commenced an action before the deceased's death, it shall proceed without necessity of revivor.

The damages shall go to the surviving spouse and next of kin free from the claims of creditors.

Code 1858, § 2293; Shan., § 4028; mod. Code 1932, § 8238; Acts 1975, ch. 284, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-609.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 151, 638.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 31.

Law Reviews.

Some Order Out of Chaos in Wrongful Death Law (T. A. Smedley), 37 Vand. L. Rev. 273 (1984).

Cited: Stanford v. Holloway, 25 Tenn. App. 379, 157 S.W.2d 864, 1941 Tenn. App. LEXIS 120 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1941); Memphis S. R. Co. v. Cooper, 203 Tenn. 425, 313 S.W.2d 444, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 321 (1958); Johnson v. Metropolitan Government of Nashville & Davidson County, 665 S.W.2d 717, 1984 Tenn. LEXIS 745 (Tenn. 1984).

20-5-109. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-5-109 (Acts 1897, ch. 86, § 1; Shan., § 4029a1; Code 1932, § 8241; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-610), concerning wrongful death of married women and succession to cause of action, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 1.

20-5-110. Action for death of spouse.

A suit for the wrongful killing of the spouse may be brought in the name of the surviving spouse for the benefit of the surviving spouse and the children of the deceased, in the name of the administrator of the deceased spouse or in the name of the next of kin of the spouse.

The surviving spouse may effect a bona fide compromise in such a suit or right of action and may execute a valid release that shall be binding upon all the children of the deceased or next of kin of the deceased.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the right to institute and the right to collect any proceeds from a wrongful death action granted by this section to a surviving spouse shall be waived, if the children or next of kin establish the surviving spouse has abandoned the deceased spouse as described in § 36-4-101(a)(13) or otherwise willfully withdrawn for a period of two (2) years.

If the period of two (2) years has passed since the time of abandonment or willful withdrawal then there is created a rebuttable presumption that the surviving spouse abandoned the deceased spouse for purposes of this section.

In an action under this section, the child or next of kin shall serve the surviving spouse with process as provided in the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure or by constructive service as may otherwise be provided by law.

A release entered into pursuant to this section by the surviving spouse shall be binding as provided in subsection (b), unless a copy of an order finding waiver of rights pursuant to this section was served or delivered to the released parties prior to the execution of the release or distribution of funds, whichever occurs first. However, a court of competent jurisdiction, upon motion of the children or next of kin, may grant injunctive relief after notice to the released parties and to the surviving spouse. The party or parties seeking the release shall not be required to answer or otherwise defend any such action.

Acts 1897, ch. 86, § 2; Shan., § 4029a2; mod. Code 1932, § 8239; Acts 1953, ch. 210, § 2; 1975, ch. 284, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-611; Acts 1981, ch. 250, § 1; 2011, ch. 366, § 3.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 366, § 4. May 30, 2011.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 637.

Law Reviews.

Professional Responsibility — Kline v. Eyrich: Use of the Common Fund Doctrine in Wrongful Death Actions in Tennessee: Preventing Unjust Enrichment or Simply Unjust?, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 233 (2003).

Loss of filial consortium (John A. Day), 37 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2001).

Wrongful Death in Tennessee — New Solutions to Recurring Problems, 9 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 85.

Cited: Weathers v. Pilkinton, 754 S.W.2d 75, 1988 Tenn. App. LEXIS 119 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1988); Estate of Baker v. Maples, 995 S.W.2d 114, 1999 Tenn. App. LEXIS 33 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1999); Rains v. Bend of the River, 124 S.W.3d 580, 2003 Tenn. App. LEXIS 537 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2003); Bowman v. City of Memphis, 329 S.W.3d 766, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 47 (Tenn. Ct. App. Jan. 27, 2010).

20-5-111. Death of beneficiary before action.

Death of a primary beneficiary, after the death of one so injured and before suit is brought, shall not work a loss of cause of action, which shall be deemed to survive in behalf of those who, after the beneficiary, are the next of kin of the decedent.

Code 1932, § 8243; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-612.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 637.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 32.

Law Reviews.

Actions for Wrongful Death in Tennessee (William T. Gamble), 4 Vand. L. Rev. 289.

Wrongful Death in Tennessee — New Solutions to Recurring Problems, 9 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 85.

20-5-112. Death of beneficiary during action.

No suit for personal injuries or death from a wrongful act, in any of the courts of this state, whether on appeal or otherwise, and whether in an inferior or appellate court, shall abate or be abated, because or on account of the death of the beneficiary or beneficiaries for whose use and benefit the suit was brought, and the suit shall be proceeded with to final judgment, as though the beneficiary or beneficiaries had not died, for the use and benefit of the next of kin of the deceased beneficiary.

Acts 1903, ch. 317, § 1; Shan., § 4029a3; mod. Code 1932, § 8242; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-613.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 637.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 32.

Law Reviews.

Wrongful Death in Tennessee — New Solutions to Recurring Problems, 9 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 85.

Cited: Nashville v. Reese, 138 Tenn. 471, 197 S.W. 492, 1917 Tenn. LEXIS 58 (1917); Smith v. Illinois C. R. Co., 394 F.2d 254, 1968 U.S. App. LEXIS 6843 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1968).

20-5-113. Damages recoverable in wrongful death.

Where a person's death is caused by the wrongful act, fault or omission of another and suit is brought for damages, as provided for by §§20-5-106 and20-5-107, the party suing shall, if entitled to damages, have the right to recover for the mental and physical suffering, loss of time and necessary expenses resulting to the deceased from the personal injuries, and also the damages resulting to the parties for whose use and benefit the right of action survives from the death consequent upon the injuries received.

Acts 1883, ch. 186, § 1; Shan., § 4029; Code 1932, § 8240; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-614.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 637.

Law Reviews.

“Jordan” Stew, 38 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2002).

Loss of filial consortium (John A. Day), 37 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2001).

Punitive Damages and Business Organizations: A Pathetic Fallacy, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 971 (2000).

Tort Law — Loss of Consortium Damages for Spouse and Children, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 475 (2000).

Torts — Hataway v. McKinley: Moving From Spacial Relationships to Significant Relationships, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 257 (1992).

Torts — Taylor v. Beard: The Tennessee Supreme Court Declines Adoption of a Cause of Action for Loss of Parental Consortium in Personal Injury Cases, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 737 (2004).

Cited: All v. John Gerber Co., 36 Tenn. App. 134, 252 S.W.2d 138, 1952 Tenn. App. LEXIS 100 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1952); Management Servs., Inc. v. Hellman, 40 Tenn. App. 127, 289 S.W.2d 711, 1955 Tenn. App. LEXIS 123 (1955); Kindellan v. Arwood Material Co., 338 F. Supp. 1210, 1972 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14899 (E.D. Tenn. 1972); Sharpe v. Lewisburg, 677 F. Supp. 1362, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 905 (M.D. Tenn. 1988); Wilkerson v. Altizer, 845 S.W.2d 744, 1992 Tenn. App. LEXIS 325 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1992); Fye v. Kennedy, 991 S.W.2d 754, 1998 Tenn. App. LEXIS 411 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1998); Rains v. Bend of the River, 124 S.W.3d 580, 2003 Tenn. App. LEXIS 537 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2003); Necessary v. Life Care Ctrs. of Am., Inc., — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 698 (Tenn. Ct. App. Nov. 16, 2007); Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009); Bowman v. City of Memphis, 329 S.W.3d 766, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 47 (Tenn. Ct. App. Jan. 27, 2010); Taylor v. Lakeside Behavioral Health Sys., — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 198 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 15, 2010); Zakour v. Ut Med. Group, Inc., — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 261 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 19, 2011).

20-5-114. Death of executor or administrator.

When any sole executor or administrator is plaintiff or defendant and dies, the suit may be revived by or against the executor, administrator de bonis non or other successor in the interest of the decedent.

Code 1858, § 2853 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 65, §§ 4, 5); Shan., § 4574; Code 1932, § 8699; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-616.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 709.

Cited: Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009).

20-5-115. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-5-115 (Code 1858, § 2854 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 64); Shan., § 4575; Code 1932, § 8700; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-617), concerning revival of appeal or error was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 1(2). For present provisions, see T.R.A.P. 19.

20-5-116. Party substituted in revivor.

Suit abated by the death of either party may be revived by or against the heir, personal representative, guardian or assign, as the case may be, who may be legally entitled to the decedent's place in the subject matter of the litigation.

Code 1858, § 2859 (deriv. Acts 1786, ch. 14, § 1; 1794, ch. 1, § 64; 1809 (Sept.), ch. 121, § 3); Shan., § 4579; Code 1932, § 8704; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-618.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 51.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 709.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, §§ 27, 32; 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 50.

Cited: Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009).

20-5-117. Death of nominal plaintiff.

Where a suit is commenced in the name of one person for the use of another and the nominal plaintiff dies, the suit may be prosecuted without a revivor, as if the death had not happened.

Code 1858, § 2858 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 29, § 3); Shan., § 4578; Code 1932, § 8703; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-621.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 319.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 708.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 29; 3 Tenn. Juris., Assignments, §§ 51, 53.

Cited: Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009).

20-5-118. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§20-5-118,20-5-119 (Code 1858, §§ 2860, 2861 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 16, §§ 1, 2); Shan., §§ 4580, 4581; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8705, 8706; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 20-622, 20-623), concerning marriage of party and intervention of husband of party, were repealed by Acts 2001, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2001.

20-5-119. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§20-5-118,20-5-119 (Code 1858, §§ 2860, 2861 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 16, §§ 1, 2); Shan., §§ 4580, 4581; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8705, 8706; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 20-622, 20-623), concerning marriage of party and intervention of husband of party, were repealed by Acts 2001, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2001.

20-5-120. Automobile liability insurance carrier negligent in failing to settle claim against insured — Survival of action — Assignment of right of action for benefit of creditors.

Any cause of action belonging to an insured person against the insured's automobile liability insurance carrier, based upon the negligence or bad faith of the insurance carrier in failing or refusing to settle any claim against the insured person within the limits of the insured's automobile liability insurance policy, shall survive the death of the insured person and shall pass to the insured's personal representative.

Any cause of action within the purview of subsection (a) shall by operation of law be assigned to and be an asset belonging to any trustee in bankruptcy, receiver or other person acting in a representative capacity for the creditors of the insured person, and the cause of action may be filed and maintained by the trustee, receiver or other person acting in a representative capacity for the creditors of the insured person in the trustee's, receiver's or representative's own name as the representative in any court having jurisdiction and venue of the cause of action against the automobile liability insurance carrier of the insured person.

No action within the purview of subsection (a) now pending or hereafter filed in any court of this state shall be abated or dismissed by any court upon the grounds that the action is or was not assignable by the insured person to one (1) of the persons or class of persons as set out in subsections (a) and (b).

Acts 1967, ch. 381, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., §§ 20-624 — 20-626; modified.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 691.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Assignments, § 12; 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 26.

Law Reviews.

Excess Liability of Insurers in Tennessee (Phillip A. Fleissner), 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 82.

Insurance — Insurer's Liability for Excess Judgment When Policy Has a Per Person Maximum, 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 289.

Cited: Can Do Pension & Profit Sharing Plan & Successor Plans v. Manier, Herod, Hollabaugh & Smith, 922 S.W.2d 865, 1996 Tenn. LEXIS 304 (Tenn. 1996); Timmins v. Lindsey, 310 S.W.3d 834, 2009 Tenn. App. LEXIS 731 (Tenn. Ct. App. Oct. 28, 2009).

Collateral References.

Excess carrier's right to maintain action against primary liability insurer for wrongful failure to settle claim against insured. 10 A.L.R.4th 879.

Liability insurer's potential liability for failure to settle claim against insured as subject to garnishment by insured's judgment creditors. 60 A.L.R.3d 1190.

Abatement and revival
41-47, 72(8, 9).